Utah statutes.
53-2-406.   Reporting.

(1)  By no later than December 31 of each year, the division shall provide a written report to the governor and the Executive Offices and Criminal Justice Appropriations Subcommittee of:

(a)  the division's activities under this part;

(b)  money expended or committed to be expended in accordance with this part;

(c)  the balances in the disaster recovery fund; and

(d)  any unexpended balance of appropriations from the disaster recovery fund.

(2) (a)  The governor and the Department of Public Safety shall report to the Legislative Management Committee an expenditure or commitment to expend made in accordance with Subsection 53-2-403(1)(d)(i)(B).

(b)  The governor and the Department of Public Safety shall make the report required by this Subsection (2) on or before the sooner of:

(i)  the day on which the governor calls the Legislature into session in accordance with Section 63K-1-302; or

(ii)  15 days after the division makes the expenditure or commitment to expend described in Subsection 53-2-403(1)(d)(i)(B).

(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), before the division makes an expenditure or commitment to expend described in Subsection 53-2-403(1)(d)(i)(C), the governor and the Department of Public Safety shall submit the expenditure or commitment to expend to the Executive Appropriations Committee for its review and recommendations.

(b)  The Executive Appropriations Committee shall review the expenditure or commitment to expend and may:

(i)  recommend that the division make the expenditure or commitment to expend;

(ii)  recommend that the division not make the expenditure or commitment to expend; or

(iii)  recommend to the governor that the governor call a special session of the Legislature to review and approve or reject the expenditure or commitment to expend.



Amended by Chapter 323, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 370, 2010 General Session

